Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5159YH (5) 91 jm/ns H.F. 2067 Section 1. Section 123.130, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. All class âAâ premises shall be located within the state. 3 All beer received by the holder of a class âAâ beer permit from 4 the holder of a certificate of compliance before being resold 5 must first come to rest on the licensed premises of the permit 6 holder, must be inventoried, and is subject to the barrel tax 7 when resold as provided in section 123.136 . A class âAâ beer 8 permittee shall not store beer overnight except on unless 9 the premises are licensed under a class âAâ beer permit or 10 authorized under a permit issued pursuant to section 123.130A . 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 123.130A Temporary class âAâ beer 12 permits for native breweries ââ manufacture and storage ââ fee. 13 1. A native brewery holding a class âAâ beer permit may 14 apply for a temporary class âAâ beer permit under this section. 15 2. A native brewery shall submit an application for 16 a temporary permit under this section to the department 17 electronically, or in a manner prescribed by the director, for 18 each off-premises site the native brewery intends to use as 19 described in subsection 4. 20 3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the 21 requirements of a temporary class âAâ beer permit are the same 22 as a class âAâ beer permit. 23 4. A person holding a temporary class âAâ beer permit may, 24 on a temporary basis for a period not to exceed nine months, 25 manufacture beer off premises using the personâs own equipment 26 or store beer overnight off premises. A temporary class âAâ 27 beer permit does not authorize a person to sell beer at the 28 off-premises location. 29 5. The fee for a temporary permit issued pursuant to this 30 section is one-half of the annual permit fee the holder paid 31 pursuant to section 123.134, subsection 2. 32 6. A refund of fees paid shall not be made for a temporary 33 license issued pursuant to this section. A temporary permit 34 issued pursuant to this section is renewable up to two times. 35 -1- LSB 5159YH (5) 91 jm/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 2067